Massachusetts, session 194th, H3724.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of Chapter 161B, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the phrase “1 year” from line 27 and 28 and inserting in place there
of the following phrase:- 2 years .
SECTION 2. Said section 5 is hereby further amended by striking out the word “1-year”
from line 40 and inserting in place thereof the following word:- 2-year .
SECTION 3. Section 5 of Chapter 161B, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the phrase “1 year” from line 42 and inserting in place there of the
following phase:- 2 years.
SECTION 4. Said section 5 is hereby further amended by striking out the word “1-year”
from line 53 and inserting in place thereof the following word:- 2-year .
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 5 is hereby further amended after line 53 by inserting the following
paragraph:-
One representative of the Gateway Municipality rider community population shall serve
on the advisory board as a voting member for a term of 3 years. Each Gateway Municipality in
the region, as defined by MGL Chap 23A Section 3A, shall appoint a representative that is an
active rider of the regional transit authority whom shall serve for a term of 3 years ; provided,
however, that the representative of the disabled community, rider community and gateway
municipality rider community shall not be appointed by the same city or town in the region. For
authority regions that contain more than one Gateway Municipality, each municipality shall
appoint a representative on a rotating basis in an order as determined by the board. The mayor or
city manager and the chairman, town manager or town administrator shall appoint a resident of
the city or town for this purpose.
of 2